Utah statutes.
77-1-7.   Dismissal without trial -- Custody or discharge of defendant.
(1) (a)  Further prosecution for an offense is not barred if the court
dismisses an information or indictment based on the ground:
(i)  there was unreasonable delay;
(ii)  the court is without jurisdiction;
(iii)  the offense was not properly alleged in the information or indictment;
or
(iv)  there was a defect in the impaneling or the proceedings relating to the
grand jury.
(b)  The court may make orders regarding custody of the defendant pending the
filing of new charges as the interest of justice may require.   Otherwise, the
defendant shall be discharged and bail exonerated.
(2)  An order of dismissal based upon unconstitutional delay in bringing the
defendant to trial or upon the statute of limitations is a bar to any other
prosecution for the offense charged.
